Mississippi, session 2026, HB854.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 73-11-65, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-11-65.  (1)  Every funeral service or interment, or part thereof, that is conducted in Mississippi must be in the actual charge and under the supervision of a funeral director or funeral service licensee who is licensed under this chapter.  However, this section shall not prevent a family from burying its own dead without charge. (2)  A funeral director assistant, under the supervision of a licensed funeral director, may perform all of the activities that a funeral director may perform except for making funeral arrangements. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.